Maryland, session 2025, HB1203.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
4–312.
(a) (2) As to all or any part of any transportation facilities project, the
Authority may:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1203*

HOUSE BILL 1203
(i) Fix, revise, charge, and collect rentals, rates, fees, tolls, and other
charges and revenues for its use or for its services; and
(ii) Contract with any person who desires its use for any purpose and
fix the terms, conditions, rentals, rates, fees, tolls, or other charges or revenues for this use.
(b) The rentals, rates, fees, tolls, and other charges and revenues designated as
security for any bonds issued under this subtitle shall be fixed and adjusted from time to
time, either with respect to a particular transportation facilities project or in respect of the
aggregate of the charges and revenues from other transportation facilities projects under
the control of the Authority, as may be specified by law or in any applicable resolution or
trust agreement, so as to provide funds that, together with any other available revenues,
are sufficient as long as the bonds are outstanding and unpaid to:
(1) Pay the costs of maintaining, repairing, and operating the
transportation facilities project or projects financed in whole or in part by one or more series
of outstanding and unpaid bonds, to the extent that payment is not otherwise provided;
(2) Pay the principal of and the interest on these bonds as they become due
and payable;
(3) Create reasonable reserves that are anticipated will be needed for these
purposes; and
(4) Provide funds for paying the cost of replacements, renewals, and
improvements.
(c) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the rentals, rates, fees,
tolls, and other charges and revenues are not subject to supervision or regulation by any
instrumentality, agency, or unit of this State or any of its political subdivisions.
(2) This subtitle does not permit the exercise of any power or the
undertaking of any activity that would conflict with the provisions and limitations of the
federal Urban Mass Transportation Act of 1964.
(3) Tolls for the use of the bridge carrying the John F. Kennedy Memorial
Highway over the Susquehanna River may not be less than the comparable tolls charged
for the use of the Susquehanna River Bridge.
(4) THE AUTHORITY MAY NOT CHARGE A TOLL FOR THE USE OF THE
NEW BRIDGE OVER THE PATAPSCO RIVER BUILT AS A REPLACEMENT FOR THE
COLLAPSED FRANCIS SCOTT KEY BRIDGE FOR THE FIRST 5 YEARS FOLLOWING THE
OPENING OF THE BRIDGE TO PASSENGER TRAFFIC.
[(4)] (5) Prior to fixing or revising tolls on any part of any transportation
facilities project, the Authority shall provide, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, to the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee, Senate Finance

HOUSE BILL 1203 3
Committee, House Appropriations Committee, and House Ways and Means Committee
information on the proposed toll charges, including:
(i) The annual revenues generated by the toll charges;
(ii) The proposed use of the revenues; and
(iii) The proposed commuter discount rates.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.